Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3559
Recall petition; filing form; filing limitation.

No recall petition filing form shall be filed against a trustee under section 18-3553 within twelve months after a recall election has failed to remove him or her from office, within six months after the beginning of his or her term of office, or within six months prior to the incumbent filing deadline for the office.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 59.
April 17, 2026